Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB172.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 2680YC (1) 91 th/ns H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 321.20B, subsection 4, paragraph a, 1 unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2025, is amended to read as 2 follows: 3 If a peace officer stops a motor vehicle registered in this 4 state and the driver is unable to provide proof of financial 5 liability coverage, the peace officer shall do one of the 6 following if the driver has not been convicted of a violation 7 of subsection 1 within the previous five-year period : 8 Sec. 2. Section 321.20B, subsection 4, paragraph c, Code 9 2025, is amended by striking the paragraph. 10 Sec. 3. Section 321.20B, subsection 5, unnumbered paragraph 11 1, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 12 If the a peace officer stops a motor vehicle is not 13 registered in this state and the driver is a nonresident and 14 unable to provide proof of financial liability coverage , the 15 peace officer shall do one of the following if the driver has 16 not been convicted of a violation of subsection 1 within the 17 previous five-year period : 18 Sec. 4. Section 321.20B, subsection 5, paragraph b, Code 19 2025, is amended by striking the paragraph and inserting in 20 lieu thereof the following: 21 b. Issue a citation to the driver. 22 Sec. 5. Section 321.20B, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 23 following new subsections: 24 NEW SUBSECTION . 5A. If a peace officer stops a motor 25 vehicle and the driver is unable to provide proof of financial 26 liability coverage and has been convicted of a violation of 27 subsection 1 within the previous five-year period, the peace 28 officer shall arrest the driver. 29 a. If the motor vehicle is registered in this state, the 30 peace officer may remove the motor vehicleâs registration 31 plates and registration receipt, in which case subsection 4, 32 paragraph âaâ , subparagraph (3), subparagraph division (a), 33 applies. 34 b. The peace officer may impound the motor vehicle, in 35 -1- LSB 2680YC (1) 91 th/ns 1/ 4 H.F. _____ which case subsection 4, paragraph âaâ , subparagraph (4), 1 subparagraph divisions (b) and (c), apply. 2 c. If the peace officer takes action under paragraph âaâ or 3 âbâ , and the owner of the vehicle provides proof of financial 4 liability coverage to the clerk of court, subsection 4, 5 paragraph âbâ , subparagraph (1), applies. 6 NEW SUBSECTION . 5B. An owner or driver cited for or charged 7 with a violation of subsection 1 who produces to the clerk of 8 court prior to the date of the personâs court appearance proof 9 that financial liability coverage was in effect for the motor 10 vehicle at the time the person was stopped, or if the driver 11 is not the owner of the motor vehicle, proof that financial 12 liability coverage was in effect for the driver with respect 13 to the motor vehicle being driven at the time the driver was 14 stopped in the same manner as if the motor vehicle were owned 15 by the driver, shall be given a receipt indicating that proof 16 was provided, and the citation or charge shall be dismissed by 17 the court. Upon dismissal, the court or clerk of court shall 18 assess the costs of the action against the defendant. 19 NEW SUBSECTION . 5C. a. Except as provided in paragraph 20 âbâ , a person convicted of a violation of subsection 1 is guilty 21 of a simple misdemeanor punishable as a scheduled violation 22 under section 805.8A, subsection 14, paragraph âfâ . 23 b. A person convicted of a second or subsequent violation 24 of subsection 1 within a five-year period is guilty of a class 25 âDâ felony. 26 Sec. 6. Section 805.8A, subsection 14, paragraph f, Code 27 2025, is amended to read as follows: 28 f. Proof of financial responsibility. If, in connection with 29 a motor vehicle accident, a person is charged and found guilty 30 of a violation of section 321.20B, subsection 1 , the scheduled 31 fine is six hundred forty-five dollars; otherwise, the 32 scheduled fine for a violation of section 321.20B, subsection 33 1 , is three hundred twenty-five dollars. Notwithstanding 34 section 805.12 , fines collected pursuant to this paragraph 35 -2- LSB 2680YC (1) 91 th/ns 2/ 4 H.F. _____ shall be submitted to the state court administrator and 1 distributed fifty percent to the victim compensation fund 2 established in section 915.94 , twenty-five percent to the 3 county in which such fine is imposed, and twenty-five percent 4 to the general fund of the state. This paragraph does not 5 apply to a person charged under section 321.20B, subsection 5C, 6 paragraph âbâ . 7